Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 63-21-38.
Requirements of scrap metal processor or used motor vehicle parts dealer when purchasing any vehicle or scrap vehicle.

Should a scrap metal processor or used motor vehicle parts dealer be presented the certificate of title or vehicle license plate for any vehicle or scrap vehicle purchased, that scrap metal processor or used motor vehicle parts dealer shall mail or deliver the same to the Department of Revenue as required by law.In lieu of a certificate of title, an affidavit in accordance with the provisions of Section 63-21-39(1) shall be obtained by a scrap metal processor.All other requirements of Section 63-21-39(1) shall be complied with and any other rules promulgated according to that section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 451, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 63-21-39.
Procedure where vehicle scrapped, dismantled or destroyed; procedure where title for vehicle being transferred to used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor is unavailable; obtaining title on vehicle with salvage certificate of title; Salvage Certificate of Title Fund; regulations; penalties for violation of section.

An owner who scraps, dismantles or destroys a vehicle and a person who purchases a vehicle as scrap or to be dismantled or destroyed shall indicate same on the back of the certificate of title and shall immediately cause the certificate of title and any other documents required by the Department of Revenue to be mailed or delivered to the Department of Revenue for cancellation. A certificate of title of the vehicle shall not again be issued except upon application containing the information the Department of Revenue requires, accompanied by a certificate of inspection in the form and content specified in Section 63-21-15(5) and proof of payment of a fee as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, if the owner or authorized agent of the owner has not obtained a title in his or her name for the vehicle to be transferred, has lost the title for the vehicle to be transferred, or has returned the title to the Department of Revenue in accordance with Section 63-21-39(1)(a), he or she may sign a statement swearing that, in addition to the foregoing conditions, the vehicle is at least ten (10) model years old. The statement described in this paragraph may be used only to transfer such a vehicle to a licensed used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor. The department shall promulgate a form for the statement which shall include, but not be limited to:

1. Never obtained a title to the vehicle in his or her name; or

2. Was issued a title for the vehicle, but the title was lost or stolen;

1. Is at least ten (10) model years old; and

2. Is not subject to any security interest or lien;

1. It is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both, for conviction of a first offense of knowingly falsifying any information on this statement; and

2. It is a felony, punishable by a fine of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or imprisonment for not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years, or both, for conviction of a second or subsequent offense of knowingly falsifying any information on this statement;

A statement that the vehicle shall never be titled again; it must be dismantled or scrapped;

A description of the vehicle including the year, make, model and vehicle identification number;

The name, address, and driver’s license number of the owner;

A certification that the owner:

A certification that the vehicle:

An acknowledgment that the owner and buyer of the vehicle realizes this form will be filed with the department and that:

The owner’s signature and the date of the transaction;

The name and address of the business acquiring the vehicle;

The National Motor Vehicle Title Information System identification number; and

The business agent’s signature and date along with a printed name and title if the agent is signing on behalf of a corporation.

Until such time as the department makes available an Internet-based system, the used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor shall mail or otherwise deliver the statement required under paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) to the Department of Revenue within three (3) business days of the completion of the transaction, requesting that the department cancel the Mississippi certificate of title and registration. Once the department develops an Internet-based system, the used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor shall utilize such system and within two (2) business days electronically submit the information contained in the statement using that system.

Within two (2) business days of each day’s close of business, the used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor who purchases or receives motor vehicles for scrap or for parts shall deliver in a format approved by the department, by electronic means once developed and made available by the department, a list of all such vehicles purchased that day for scrap or for parts. That list shall contain the following information:

The name, address and contact information for the reporting entity;

The vehicle identification numbers of such vehicles;

The dates such vehicles were obtained;

The names of the individuals or entities from whom the vehicles were obtained, for use by law enforcement personnel and appropriate governmental agencies only;

A statement of whether the vehicles were, or will be, crushed or disposed of, or offered for sale or other purposes;

A statement of whether the vehicle is intended for export out of the United States; and

The National Motor Vehicle Title Information System identification number of the business acquiring the vehicle.

(i) For purposes of this subsection, the term “motor vehicle” shall not include a vehicle which has been crushed or flattened by mechanical means such that it is no longer the motor vehicle as described by the certificate of title, or such that the vehicle identification number is no longer visible or accessible.

In cases in which crushed or flattened vehicles are purchased or received, the purchasing or receiving used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor shall verify that the seller has reported the vehicles in accordance with this subsection. Such verification may be in the form of a certification from the seller or a contract between the seller and the purchasing or receiving used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor attesting to the seller’s compliance with the reporting requirements of this subsection. Such verification must clearly identify the seller by a government issued photograph identification card or employer identification number, and the verification and copy of the identification card or number shall be maintained by the purchasing or receiving used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor for a period of not less than two (2) years.

The information obtained by the department in accordance with paragraph (d) of this subsection (1) shall be reported to the National Motor Vehicle Title Information System, in a format that will satisfy the requirement for reporting this information, in accordance with rules adopted by the United States Department of Justice in 28 C.F.R. 25.56.

Until such time as the department develops and makes available the Internet-based system described in paragraph (d) of this subsection, the used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor who purchases or receives motor vehicles for scrap or for parts shall deliver the information required by paragraph (d) to the National Motor Vehicle Title Information System through any data consolidator approved by such system, within forty-eight (48) hours of the day the vehicle was purchased or acquired by such used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor which shall satisfy the requirements of paragraph (d).

The information obtained by the department in accordance with paragraph (d) of this subsection (1) shall be made available only to law enforcement agencies and for purposes of canceling certificates of title. The information shall otherwise be considered to be confidential business information of the respective reporting entities.

All records required under the provisions of this subsection shall be maintained for a period of two (2) years by the reporting entity and shall include a scanned or photocopied copy of the seller’s or seller’s representative’s driver’s license or state-issued identification card.

A person who knowingly and willfully violates this subsection (1), or any person who knowingly and willfully falsifies or assists another person in falsifying the statement or information required under paragraphs (b) or (d) of this subsection, or any person who knowingly and willfully sells a vehicle upon which there is an unsatisfied lien or security interest, or who purchases a vehicle without complying with either subsection (1)(a) or (1)(b) of this section and who knowingly and willfully destroys or dismantles a vehicle upon which he knows that there is an unsatisfied lien or security interest shall:

Be guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both, for conviction of a first offense; or

Upon conviction of a second or subsequent offense, a felony, punishable by imprisonment for not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years or a fine of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or both.

In addition, the court may order each person convicted to pay restitution to any party suffering monetary loss in the amount of such loss. No part of any sentence imposed by the court shall be suspended unless such restitution has been paid in full.

A person who knowingly and willfully fails to deliver the title as required under paragraph (a) of this subsection, or the statement required under paragraph (b) of this subsection to the Department of Revenue within seventy-two (72) hours of the completion of the transaction, or who, until such time as the department develops and makes available the Internet-based system described in paragraph (d), fails to deliver the information required by paragraph (d) to the National Motor Vehicle Title Information System through any data consolidator approved by such system, within two (2) business days of the day the vehicle was purchased or acquired by such used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor shall be in violation of this section, and subject to a civil penalty of up to One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per violation. Actions to impose this penalty may be brought by any local or state law enforcement agency, district attorney, or by the Attorney General, in any court of competent jurisdiction. One-half (1/2) of the monies generated from such civil penalties shall be deposited in a special fund created in the State Treasury for use by the Department of Revenue’s Title Bureau, and one-half (1/2) of the monies generated from such civil penalties shall be deposited in the general fund of the municipality if the suit was brought in a municipal court, or in the general fund of the county if the suit was brought in the court of a county.

For the purpose of requesting a branded title on a vehicle with a salvage certificate of title, every owner of a vehicle that has been issued a salvage certificate of title in this state or any other state which has been restored in this state to its operating condition which existed prior to the event which caused the salvage certificate of title to be issued shall make application to the Department of Revenue, accompanied by a certificate of inspection issued by the Department of Public Safety in the form and content specified in Section 63-21-15(5) and the payment of a fee of Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00) for each motor vehicle for which a certificate of inspection is issued. In addition, the Department of Public Safety may charge such a person a fee in the amount of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for performing any vehicle identification number verification required by federal law or regulation for the vehicle for which the person is applying for a title. All such monies shall be collected by the Department of Public Safety and paid to the State Treasurer for deposit in a special fund that is hereby created in the State Treasury to be known as the “Salvage Certificate of Title Fund.” Monies in the special fund may be expended by the Department of Public Safety, upon appropriation by the Legislature. The Department of Revenue shall establish by regulation the minimum requirements by which a vehicle which has been issued a salvage certificate of title may be issued a branded title.

Before a branded title may be issued for a vehicle for which a salvage certificate of title has been issued, the applicant shall submit, by hand delivery or mail, such documents and information to the Department of Public Safety as the department may require for the purpose of determining if the vehicle complies with the requirements of this section and all applicable regulations promulgated by the Commissioner of Public Safety and the Department of Revenue. The Department of Public Safety also may require that an applicant bring a vehicle for which application for a branded title is being made to a Highway Patrol facility for a visual inspection whenever the department deems that a visual inspection is necessary or advisable. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit inspectors of the Mississippi Highway Patrol from conducting on-site inspections and investigations of motor vehicle rebuilders or motor vehicle repair businesses to determine if such businesses are in compliance with all applicable laws relating to the motor vehicle title laws of this state and regulations promulgated by the Commissioner of Public Safety and the Department of Revenue.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-39; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 19; Laws, 1991, ch. 575, § 3; Laws, 2006, ch. 466, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 451, § 3; Laws, 2013, ch. 570, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013; Laws, 2018, ch. 358, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 63-21-40.
Issuance of salvage certificates of title for damaged manufactured or mobile homes.

An owner who scraps, dismantles or destroys a manufactured home or mobile home for which a certificate of title has been issued, and a person who purchases a manufactured home or mobile home as scrap or to be dismantled or destroyed for which a certificate of title has been issued, shall make such an indication on the back of the certificate of title and shall immediately cause the certificate of title and any other documents required by the State Tax Commission to be mailed or delivered to the commission for cancellation.

An insurance company which as a result of paying a total loss claim becomes the owner of a mobile home or manufactured home and obtains the insured’s certificate of title, within seventy-two (72) hours after obtaining the title shall apply to the State Tax Commission for a new certificate of title, surrendering with its application the current certificate of title, including documentation to show if the title applied for is for a salvage mobile home or salvage manufactured home, and including a signed statement on original company letterhead that states: ( ) collision damage, ( ) flood damage, ( ) fire damage, ( ) wind damage, or ( ) other damage. If the damage is “other damage,” the company shall describe the nature of the damage. The insurance company shall staple this statement to the certificate of title and make a notation on the face of the certificate of title. The application shall be made by the insurance company in the manner and form prescribed and provided by the State Tax Commission. The provisions of this subsection do not apply to a mobile home or manufactured home that is twenty (20) years old or older.

Brands appearing on certificates of title issued by this state or another state that reveal a pertinent fact or facts about a mobile home or manufactured home shall be continued on certificates of title issued by this state. The State Tax Commission shall brand a certificate of title with “collision damage,” “flood damage,” “fire damage,” “wind damage,” or “other damage” where the immediate previous certificate of title was issued by this state. The State Tax Commission shall brand a certificate of title to be issued by this state with the same or other brands where the immediate previous certificate of title was issued by another state and such title indicates the same or other brands are appropriate. Such certificate of title shall not attest to the condition of the mobile home or manufactured home at the time the certificate of title is issued or to whether the mobile home or manufactured home has been rebuilt according to any applicable federal or state laws, rules or regulations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 63-21-41.
Applicability of chapter to particular liens and security interests.

This chapter does not apply to or affect:

A lien given by statute or rule of law to a supplier of services or materials for the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home;

A lien given by statute to the United States, this state, or any political subdivision of this state;

A security interest in a vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home created by a manufacturer or dealer who holds the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home for sale; however, a buyer in the ordinary course of trade from the manufacturer or dealer takes title free of the security interest.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-40; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 20; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 63-21-42.
Creation of security interest by transaction involving motor vehicle or trailers which provides for adjustment of rental price.

In the case of motor vehicles, trailers, manufactured homes or mobile homes, notwithstanding any other provision of law, a transaction does not create a sale or security interest merely because it provides that the rental price is permitted or required to be adjusted under the agreement either upward or downward by reference to the amount realized upon sale or other disposition of the motor vehicle, trailer, manufactured home or mobile home.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 445, § 5; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 63-21-43.
Perfection of security interests.

Unless excepted by Section 63-21-41, a security interest in a vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home of a type which a certificate of title is required is not valid against creditors of the owner or subsequent transferees or lienholders of the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home unless perfected as provided in this chapter.

A security interest is perfected at the time the owner signs a security agreement describing the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home, the secured party gives value, the owner has rights in the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home, and an application for certificate of title signed by the owner is presented to a designated agent; provided, however, that a purchase money security interest under Chapter 9, Title 75 (Uniform Commercial Code - secured transactions) in a mobile home or a manufactured home is perfected against the rights of judicial lien creditors and execution creditors on and after the date such purchase money security interest attaches.

The designated agent shall deliver to the Department of Revenue the existing certificate of title, if any, an application for a certificate of title containing the name and address of the lienholder and the date of his security agreement, and the required fee, but the security interest will perfect at the time the requirements of subsection 2(a) of this section are met.

If a vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home is subject to a security interest when brought into this state, the validity of the security interest is determined by the law of the jurisdiction where the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home was when the security interest attached, subject to the following:

If the parties understood at the time the security interest attached that the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home would be kept in this state and it was brought into this state within thirty (30) days thereafter for purposes other than transportation through this state, the validity of the security interest in this state is determined by the law of this state.

If the security interest was perfected under the law of the jurisdiction where the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home was when the security interest attached, the following rules apply:

If the name of the lienholder is shown on an existing certificate of title issued by that jurisdiction, his security interest continues perfected in this state.

If the name of the lienholder is not shown on an existing certificate of title issued by that jurisdiction the security interest continues perfected in this state for four (4) months after a first certificate of title of the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home is issued in this state, and also thereafter if, within the period of four (4) months, it is perfected in this state. The security interest may also be perfected in this state after the expiration of the period of four (4) months, in which case perfection dates from the time of perfection in this state.

If the security interest was not perfected under the law of the jurisdiction where the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home was when the security interest attached, it may be perfected in this state, in which case perfection dates from the time of perfection in this state.

A security interest may be perfected under paragraph (b)(ii) or paragraph (c) of this subsection, either as provided in subsection (2), or by the holder of the lien created out of this state delivering to a county tax collector or a designated agent a notice of security interest in the form the Department of Revenue prescribes, together with documents to support the security interest as required by the Department of Revenue and the required fee. The county tax collector or a designated agent shall process said notice in the manner prescribed by the Department of Revenue.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-41; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 21; Laws, 1970, ch. 483, § 6; Laws, 1977, ch. 313; Laws, 1995, ch. 437, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1999; Laws, 2018, ch. 401, § 9, eff from and after January 1, 2019.

§ 63-21-45.
Procedure upon creation of security interest.

If an owner creates a security interest in a vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home:

The owner shall immediately execute the application in the space provided therefor on the certificate of title, or on a separate form the State Tax Commission prescribes to name the lienholder on the certificate showing the name and address of the lienholder and the date of his security agreement, and cause the certificate, application and the required fee to be delivered to the lienholder.

The lienholder shall immediately cause the certificate, application and required fee to be mailed or delivered to a county tax collector or a designated agent.

Upon request of the owner or subordinate lienholder, a lienholder in possession of the certificate of title shall either mail or deliver the certificate to the subordinate lienholder for delivery to a county tax collector or a designated agent or, upon receipt from the subordinate lienholder of the owner’s application and the required fee, mail or deliver them to a county tax collector or a designated agent with the certificate. The delivery of the certificate does not affect the rights of the first lienholder under his security agreement.

Upon receipt of the certificate of title, application and the required fee, the State Tax Commission shall either endorse on the certificate or issue a new certificate containing the name and address of the new lienholder, and mail the certificate to the first lienholder named in it.

Information evidencing a bank or lending institution’s lien or other security interest in a motor vehicle’s, manufactured home’s or mobile home’s certificate of title may be transferred by electronic means as provided in Section 63-21-16.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-42; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 22; Laws, 1970, ch. 483, § 7; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 63-21-47.
Assignment of security interest by lienholder.

A lienholder may assign, absolutely or otherwise, his security interest in the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home to a person other than the owner without affecting the interest of the owner or the validity of the security interest. However, any person without notice of the assignment is protected in dealing with the lienholder as the holder of the security interest and the lienholder remains liable for any obligations as lienholder until the assignee is named as lienholder on the certificate in the manner prescribed by the State Tax Commission.

The commission shall file each assignment received by the commission with the required fee, and note the assignee as lienholder upon the record of notices of security interests maintained by the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-43; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 23; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 63-21-49.
Procedure upon release of security interest.

Upon the satisfaction of a security interest in a vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home for which the certificate of title is in the possession of the lienholder, he shall, within ten (10) days after demand and, in any event, within thirty (30) days, execute a release of his security interest, in the space provided therefor on the certificate or as the State Tax Commission prescribes, and mail or deliver the certificate and release to the next lienholder named therein, or, if none, to the owner or any person who delivers to the lienholder an authorization from the owner to receive the certificate. The owner other than a dealer holding the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home for resale, shall promptly cause the certificate and release to be mailed or delivered to the commission, who shall release the lienholder’s rights on the certificate or issue a new certificate.

Upon the satisfaction of a security interest in a vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home for which the certificate of title is in the possession of a prior lienholder, the lienholder whose security interest is satisfied shall within ten (10) days after demand and, in any event, within thirty (30) days execute a release in the form the commission prescribes and deliver the release to the owner or any person who delivers to the lienholder an authorization from the owner to receive it. The lienholder in possession of the certificate of title shall either deliver the certificate to the owner, or the person authorized by him, for delivery to the commission or, upon receipt of the release, mail or deliver it with the certificate to the commission who shall release the subordinate lienholder’s rights on the certificate or issue a new certificate.

Upon receipt of the aforementioned releases of security interests, the commission shall file each release in the manner prescribed by the commission and note the same upon the records of notices of security interests maintained by it.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-44; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 24; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 63-21-51.
Duty of lienholder named in notice of security interest to disclose security agreement and secured indebtedness.

A lienholder named in a notice of security interest filed by the State Tax Commission shall, upon written request of the owner or of another lienholder named on the certificate, disclose any pertinent information as to his security agreement and the indebtedness secured by it.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-45; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 25; Laws, 2001, ch. 596, § 67, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 63-21-53.
Perfection of unsatisfied security interest in previously registered vehicle.

If a security interest in a previously registered vehicle is perfected under any other applicable law of this state as of August 9, 1968, and if a security interest in a previously registered manufactured home or mobile home is perfected under any other applicable law of this state as of July 1, 1999, the security interest continues perfected until its perfection lapses under the law under which it was perfected. This would apply only to vehicles, manufactured homes or mobile homes not required to be titled under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-51; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 31; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 63-21-55.
Exclusivity of procedure in chapter for perfecting and giving notice of security interests.

Except as provided in Section 63-21-53, the method provided in this chapter of perfecting and giving notice of security interests subject to this chapter is exclusive. Security interests subject to this chapter are hereby exempted from the provisions of law which otherwise require or relate to the filing and recording of instruments creating or evidencing security interests.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-46; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 26, eff from and after passage (approved August 9, 1968).

§ 63-21-57.
Filing and recording of notices of security interests; examination of record prior to issuance or reissuance of certificate of title.

The Department of Revenue shall file each notice of security interest received by the department with the required fee and maintain a record of all notices of security interests filed by the department:

Alphabetically, under the name of the owner;

Under the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home identification number;

Under the certificate of title number; and

In the discretion of the department, by any other method it determines.

The department, before issuing or reissuing a certificate of title, shall check the name of the owner and the certificate of title number of the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home against the record above provided for.

The recordkeeping requirements are in addition to the recordkeeping requirements set forth in Section 63-21-17 and Section 63-21-37. The records required to be maintained by Section 63-21-17 shall be maintained indefinitely.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-52; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 32; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 1999; Laws, 2018, ch. 401, § 10, eff from and after January 1, 2019.

§ 63-21-59.
Suspension or revocation of certificate of title.

The State Tax Commission shall suspend or revoke a certificate of title, upon notice and reasonable opportunity to be heard, if the commission finds:

The certificate of title was fraudulently procured or erroneously issued, or

The vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home has been scrapped, dismantled or destroyed.

Suspension or revocation of a certificate of title does not in itself affect the validity of a security interest noted on it.

When the commission suspends or revokes a certificate of title, the owner or person in possession of it shall, immediately upon receiving notice of the suspension or revocation, mail or deliver the certificate to the commission.

The commission may seize and impound any certificate of title which has been suspended or revoked.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-47; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 27; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 28, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 63-21-61.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2005, ch. 499, § 36 effective from and after July 1, 2005.

[Codes, 1942, § 8125-49; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 29; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 1999]

§ 63-21-63.
Schedule of fees.

There shall be paid to the Department of Revenue for issuing and processing documents required by this chapter, fees for motor vehicles according to the following schedule:

Each application for certificate of title issuedunder Section 63-21-9(2) . . . . .$ 9.00

Each application for certificate of title notissued under Section 63-21-9(2) . . . . .9.00

Each application for replacement or corrected certificate of title. . . . .9.00

Each suspension or revocation of certificate of title. . . . .9.00

Each notice of security interest. . . . .9.00

Each release of security interest. . . . .9.00

Each assignment by lienholder. . . . .9.00

Each application for information as to the status of the title of a vehicle. . . . .9.00

The designated agent may add the sum of One Dollar ($1.00) to each document processed for which a fee is charged to be retained as his commission for services rendered. All other fees collected shall be remitted to the department.

If more than one (1) transaction is involved in any application on a single vehicle and if supported by all required documents, the fee charged by the department and by the designated agent for processing and issuing shall be considered as only one (1) transaction.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-53; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 33; Laws, 1980, ch. 427, § 2; Laws, 2001, ch. 596, § 68; Laws, 2005, ch. 335, § 4; Laws, 2010, ch. 496, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 63-21-64.
Fees paid to Department of Revenue for issuing and processing necessary documents.

There shall bepaid to the Department of Revenue for issuing and processing documentsrequired by this chapter, fees for manufactured homes or mobile homesaccording to the following schedule:

Each application for certificate oftitle. . . . .$ 9.00

Each application for replacement or corrected certificate of title. . . . .9.00

Each suspensionor revocation of certificate of title. . . . .9.00

Each notice ofsecurity interest. . . . .9.00

Each releaseof security interest. . . . .9.00

Each assignmentby lienholder. . . . .9.00

Each applicationfor information as to the status of the title of a manufactured homeor mobile home. . . . .9.00

Each application for retirement, destruction or severance of title pursuant to Section 63-21-30 . . . . .9.00

The designatedagent may add the sum of One Dollar ($1.00) to each document processedfor which a fee is charged to be retained as his commission for servicesrendered. All other fees collected shall be remitted to the department.

If more thanone (1) transaction is involved in any application on a single manufacturedhome or mobile home and if supported by all required documents, thefee charged by the Tax Commission’s designated agent for processingand issuing shall be considered as only one (1) transaction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 32; Laws, 2010, ch. 496, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2010; Laws, 2018, ch. 401, § 11, eff from and after January 1, 2019.

§ 63-21-65.
Disposition of fees.

The Department of Revenue shall deposit the fees collected under this chapter into a special fund that is created in the State Treasury to the credit of the department. As much of those fees as appropriated by the Legislature shall be used by the department to defray the cost of carrying out the duties of the department, including the maintenance of the automated statewide motor vehicle and manufactured housing registration system.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-54; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 34; Laws, 1980, ch. 427, § 3; Laws, 1981, ch. 309, § 5; Laws, 1983, ch. 320, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 303; Laws, 1989, ch. 393, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 30; Laws, 2010, ch. 496, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 63-21-67.
Use of duplicate copy of application for certificate of title as permit to operate motor vehicle.

The rules and regulations promulgated by the State Tax Commission shall make suitable provisions for the use by an applicant of the duplicate copy of his application for a certificate of title to serve as a permit for the operation of the motor vehicle or the use and occupation of a manufactured home or mobile home described in the application until the commission either issues the certificate of title of such motor vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home or refuses to issue the certificate. The commission and every designated agent receiving an application for the certificate of title, when the provisions of this chapter have been otherwise complied with, shall deliver to the applicant the duplicate copy of his application which shall contain a suitable permit for the purposes mentioned in this paragraph.

In the event the commission refuses to issue the certificate of title the applicant shall, immediately upon receiving written notice from the commission that such certificate will not be issued for the reason or reasons stated in the notice, deliver or mail to the commission by registered mail the duplicate copy of his application containing the permit mentioned in the previous paragraph of this section and, in the case of a vehicle, the current privilege license tag which was issued for the vehicle. The motor vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home described in said application shall not be operated on the highways or other public places of this state or used or occupied after the applicant receives notice that the certificate will not be issued unless its operation is subsequently authorized by the commission either by the issuance of a new permit or by a certificate of title. If for any reason the said duplicate copy of the application for certificate of title and, in the case of a vehicle, the current privilege license tag which was issued for the vehicle in question is not received by the commission within ten (10) calendar days after the commission mails written notice to the applicant that it will not issue the certificate of title applied for, the commission or, at the request of the commission, any state highway patrolman, sheriff or other peace officer of this state, is authorized and empowered to require and compel the surrender of said duplicate copy of the application for certificate of title and, in the case of a vehicle, the said current privilege license tag. The commission, after it obtains possession of said duplicate copy of application for certificate of title and, in the case of a vehicle, said current privilege license tag, is authorized to retain same until it is satisfied that said applicant is entitled to receive a certificate of title of the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home in question.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-29; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 9; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 31, eff from and after July 1, 1999.